hu: Pergődob felfekvő peremének profilja: 30 fokos; 45 fokos; Baseballütő; Dupla 45 fokos; Lekerekített; Egyéb
nl: Snaredrum bearing edge profiel: 30 graden; 45 graden; Honkbalknuppel; Dubbel 45 graden; Afgerond; Anders
sk-SK: Profil hrany rezonančnej dosky malého bubna: 30-stupňový; 45-stupňový; Bejzbalová pálka; Dvojitý 45-stupňový; Zaoblený; Iný
tr: Trampet kenar kesim profili: 30 derece; 45 derece; Beyzbol sopası; Çift 45 derece; Yuvarlak; Diğer
hr-HR: Profil ruba ležaja doboša: 30 stupnjeva; 45 stupnjeva; Bejzbol palica; Dvostruko od 45 stupnjeva; Zaobljeni; Ostalo
fr: Profil du chanfrein de caisse claire: 30 degrés; 45 degrés; Batte de baseball; Double 45 degrés; Arrondi; Autre
pl: Profil krawędzi nośnej werbla: 30 stopni; 45 stopni; Kij bejsbolowy (baseball bat); Podwójne 45 stopni; Zaokrąglony; Inny
it: Profilo del bordo di appoggio del fusto del rullante: A 30 gradi; A 45 gradi; Baseball bat; Doppio a 45 gradi; Arrotondato; Altro
en: Snare drum bearing edge profile: 30-degree; 45-degree; Baseball bat; Double 45-degree; Rounded; Other
th: โปรไฟล์ขอบแบริ่งกลองสแนร์: 30 องศา; 45 องศา; ทรงไม้เบสบอล; 45 องศาคู่; โค้งมน; อื่นๆ
vi: Hồ sơ cạnh ổ trục trống snare: 30 độ; 45 độ; Gậy bóng chày; 45 độ kép; Bo tròn; Khác
cs: Profil hrany ložiska virblu: 30stupňový; 45stupňový; Tvar baseballové pálky; Dvojitý 45stupňový; Zaoblený; Jiné
zh-CN: 军鼓鼓边承托轮廓: 30 度; 45 度; 棒球棒型; 双 45 度; 圆形; 其他
ko: 스네어 드럼 베어링 엣지 형태: 30도; 45도; 베이스볼 배트; 이중 45도; 라운드형; 기타
ru: Профиль опорной кромки малого барабана: 30 градусов; 45 градусов; Baseball bat; Двойная 45 градусов; Закруглённая; Другое
bg-BG: Профил на ръба на лагера на малкия барабан: 30-градусов; 45-градусов; Тип „бейзболна бухалка“; Двоен 45-градусов; Заоблен; Друг
pt-BR: Caixa borda de contato perfil: 30 graus; 45 graus; Taco de beisebol; 45 graus duplo; Arredondado; Outro
fi: Virvelirummun viisteen profiili: 30 asteen; 45 asteen; Baseball-maila; Kaksinkertainen 45 asteen; Pyöristetty; Muu
ro-RO: Profil al marginii de așezare a feței pentru toba mică: La 30 de grade; La 45 de grade; Bâtă de baseball; Dublu la 45 de grade; Rotunjit; Altul
pt-PT: Perfil da borda de apoio do tambor de tarola: 30 graus; 45 graus; Taco de basebol; Duplo de 45 graus; Arredondado; Outro
es: Perfil del borde de apoyo de la caja: 30 grados; 45 grados; Bate de béisbol; Doble de 45 grados; Redondeado; Otro
el: Προφίλ άκρης ρουλεμάν ταμπούρου: 30 μοιρών; 45 μοιρών; Μπαστούνι του μπέιζμπολ; Διπλό 45 μοιρών; Στρογγυλεμένο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Mažojo būgno atraminės briaunos profilis: 30 laipsnių; 45 laipsnių; Beisbolo lazdos formos; Dviguba, 45 laipsnių; Užapvalinta; Kita
de: Gratungsprofil der Snare-Drum: 30 Grad; 45 Grad; Baseballschläger; Doppelte 45-Grad; Abgerundet; Andere
zh-TW: 小鼓軸承邊緣輪廓: 30 度; 45 度; 棒球棒型; 雙 45 度; 圓弧型; 其他
nb: Profil på anleggskant på skarptromme: 30-graders; 45-graders; Baseballkølle; Dobbel 45-graders; Avrundet; Annet
sl-SI: Profil nalegalnega roba malega bobna: 30-stopinjski; 45-stopinjski; Oblika palice za bejzbol; Dvojni 45-stopinjski; Zaobljeni; Drugo
sv: Kantprofil för virveltrums resonansbädd: 30 grader; 45 grader; Basebollträ; Dubbel 45 grader; Rundad; Övrigt
ja: スネアドラムのベアリングエッジ形状: 30度; 45度; ベースボールバット; ダブル45度; ラウンド; その他
da: Lejekantsprofil for lilletromme: 30 grader; 45 grader; Baseball bat; Dobbelt 45 grader; Afrundet; Andet